Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.050

Standard clauses required in requests for proposals, advertisements, and bids.

The rules adopted under RCW 39.19.030 shall include requirements for standard clauses in requests for proposals, advertisements, bids, or calls for bids, necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, which shall include notice of the statutory penalties under RCW 39.19.080 and 39.19.090 for noncompliance.

[ 1983 c 120 s 5.]